Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 3. Purposes and Powers

271B.3-010.
Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under this chapter has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 22, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, § 56, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
56, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.3-020.
General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation shall have perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and shall have the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including without limitation power to:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations (which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation), and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

Conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or without this state;

Elect directors and appoint officers, employees and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

Transact any lawful business that will aid governmental policy; and

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this section, the presence or absence of a corporate seal on or from a writing shall neither add to nor detract from the legality thereof nor affect its validity in any manner or respect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 23, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.3-030.
Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency defined in subsection (4) of this section, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One (1) or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary business affairs of the corporation:

Shall bind the corporation; and

Shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

An emergency shall exist for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 24, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.3-040.
Ultra vires.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the validity of corporate action shall not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding by:

A shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the act;

The corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or

The Attorney General under KRS

271B.14-300

.

In a shareholder’s proceeding under subsection (2)(a) of this section to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss (other than anticipated profits) suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 25, effective January 1, 1989.